test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VTI_AM_CNJ_waabandam_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTI+Cnj - AM - waabandam :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	persnum prt     dub
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 313)
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+1: waabndamaanh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2: waabndaman 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3: waabndang
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+4: waabndamnid 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+X: waabndaming 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+1+Pl: waabndamaang
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+1+Pl: waabndamang 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Pl: waabndameg
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+Pl: waabndamwaad #even parity stem = awaad?
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+1+Prt: waabndamaambaanh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Prt: waabndammba #cons 
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Prt: waabndamamba #book 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+Prt: waabndangba #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+Prt: waabndamngiba #book #this looks like 21pl, not 3sg
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+4+Prt: waabndamnipa
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+X+Prt: waabndamngiba
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+1+Pl+Prt: waabndamaangba
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Prt: waabndamngiba 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Pl+Prt: waabndamegba #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Pl+Prt: waabndamegiba #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+Pl+Prt: waabndamwaapa #odd parity stem = awaapa?
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4 #this is supposed to be changed conjunct??
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+1+Dub: waabndamwaane
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Dub: waabndamwane 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+Dub: waabndamgwenh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+4+Dub: waabndamnigwenh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+X+Dub: waabndamwiinge #striking difference from vai (wii, no nasV)
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+1+Pl+Dub: waabndamwaange
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Dub: waabndamwange 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Pl+Dub: waabndamwegwenh #odd to have nasV, but book had once for VTI too...
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+Pl+Dub: waabndamwaagwenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+1+Prt+Dub: waabndamwaambaane
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Prt+Dub: waabndamwambne #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Prt+Dub: waabndamwambane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+Prt+Dub: waabndamgobne #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+Prt+Dub: waabndamgobane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+4+Prt+Dub: waabndamnigbane #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+4+Prt+Dub: waabndamnigobane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+X+Prt+Dub: waabndamwiingbane #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+X+Prt+Dub: waabndamwiingibane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: waabndamwaangbane
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: waabndamwaangibane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: waabndamwangbane #cons 
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: waabndamwangibane #book 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: waabndamwegbane #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: waabndamwegibane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+Pl+Prt+Dub: waabndamwaagbane #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+3+Pl+Prt+Dub: waabndamwaagobane #book
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+1:        waabndanzwaanh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2:        waabndanzwan 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3:        waabndanzig 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+4:      waabndanznig 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+X:        waabndanzing #also zwing
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+1+Pl:     waabndanzwaang
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl:   waabndanzwang 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Pl:     waabndanzweg
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+Pl:     waabndanzgwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3 #sii forms extrapolated conservatively
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+1+Prt:      waabndanzwaambaanh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Prt:      waabndanzwamba    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+Prt:      waabndanzgoba #diverges from VTI
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+4+Prt:    waabndanznigba #diverges from VTI    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+X+Prt:      waabndanzngiba    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+1+Pl+Prt:   waabndanzwaangba  
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl+Prt: waabndanzwangba #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl+Prt: waabndanzwngiba #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:   waabndanzwegba #book indicates /ziwegoba/ ... egw rides again    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+Pl+Prt:   waabndanzgwaaba #diverges from VTI (/sigwaa/ need not end string)   
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4 #this is supposed to be changed conjunct??
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+1+Dub:          waabndanziiwaane    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Dub:          waabndanziiwne #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Dub:         waabndanziiwane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+Dub:          waabndanziigwenh #book lacks nasV ... generally lacks nas info for neg (prt) dub
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+4+Dub:        waabndanziingwenh #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+X+Dub:          waabndanziiwiingwenh #again, wii diff from VTI, nasV?
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+1+Pl+Dub:       waabndanziiwaange   
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl+Dub:     waabndanziiwnge #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:       waabndanziiwegwe    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+Pl+Dub:       waabndanziiwaagwenh 
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+1+Prt+Dub:       waabndanziiwaambaane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Prt+Dub:       waabndanziiwmbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+Prt+Dub:       waabndanziigbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+4+Prt+Dub:     waabndanziingobne #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+X+Prt+Dub:       waabndanziingbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:    waabndanziiwaangbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:  waabndanziiwngobne #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:    waabndanziiwegbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:    waabndanziiwaagbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     
